apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="top/ao__comp__sfx">
      <!-- Comparative --><!--Note: I've switched the definiteness marker here with <comp>, since definiteness is relevant only for positive, but I'm not sure if this is practical -->
      <!--Masculine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijeg</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijega</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijem</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijem</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijeg</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijega</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijeg</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijega</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijih</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijih</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Feminine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>lija</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liju</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lija</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijom</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijih</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Neuter-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijeg</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijega</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijem</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijem</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lije</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>lija</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijih</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lijim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lijima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lija</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lija</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Superlative--><!-- it's just "naj"+comparative-->
      <!--Absolute Superlative--><!-- "pre"+comparative, explained somewhere in this document-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="top/ao__ssup__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ao<s n="adj"/><s n="ssup"/></r></p><par n="top/ao__pst__sfx"/></e>
<!--      <e><p><l>lo</l><r>lo<s n="adv"/><s n="ssup"/></r></p></e> removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="top/ao__sup__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ao<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="top/ao__comp__sfx"/></e>
<!--      <e><p><l>lije</l><r>lo<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e> removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="top/ao__comp__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ao<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="top/ao__comp__sfx"/></e>
<!--      <e><p><l>lije</l><r>lo<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e> removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="top/ao__pst__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ao<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="top/ao__pst__sfx"/></e>
<!--      <e><p><l>lo</l><r>lo<s n="adv"/></r></p></e> removable-->
    </pardef>
    <!-- end 'top/ao'-->

    <e lm="svijetao"><i>sv</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>t</i><par n="top/ao__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svijetao"><p><l>sv</l><r>sv</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>t</i><par n="top/ao__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svijetao"><p><l>najsv</l><r>sv</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>t</i><par n="top/ao__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svijetao"><p><l>presv</l><r>sv</r></p><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>t</i><par n="top/ao__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nagao"><i>nag</i><par n="top/ao__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nagao"><i>nag</i><par n="top/ao__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nagao"><p><l>najnag</l><r>nag</r></p><par n="top/ao__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nagao"><p><l>prenag</l><r>nag</r></p><par n="top/ao__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="okrugao"><i>okrug</i><par n="top/ao__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="okrugao"><i>okrug</i><par n="top/ao__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="okrugao"><p><l>najokrug</l><r>okrug</r></p><par n="top/ao__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="okrugao"><p><l>preokrug</l><r>okrug</r></p><par n="top/ao__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rahao"><i>rah</i><par n="top/ao__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rahao"><i>rah</i><par n="top/ao__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rahao"><p><l>najrah</l><r>rah</r></p><par n="top/ao__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rahao"><p><l>prerah</l><r>rah</r></p><par n="top/ao__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="podmukao"><i>podmuk</i><par n="top/ao__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="podmukao"><i>podmuk</i><par n="top/ao__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="podmukao"><p><l>najpodmuk</l><r>podmuk</r></p><par n="top/ao__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="podmukao"><p><l>prepodmuk</l><r>podmuk</r></p><par n="top/ao__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="topao"><i>top</i><par n="top/ao__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="topao"><i>top</i><par n="top/ao__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="topao"><p><l>najtop</l><r>top</r></p><par n="top/ao__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="topao"><p><l>pretop</l><r>top</r></p><par n="top/ao__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iščezao"><i>iščez</i><par n="top/ao__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iščezao"><i>iščez</i><par n="top/ao__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iščezao"><p><l>najiščez</l><r>iščez</r></p><par n="top/ao__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iščezao"><p><l>preiščez</l><r>iščez</r></p><par n="top/ao__ssup__adj"/></e>
